Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7090.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-12.1-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-12.1 entitled "Primaries
for Election of Delegates to National Conventions and for Presidential Preference" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
17-12.1-1. Date of primaries for election of delegates to national conventions.
(a) A primary election for the election of delegates to the national convention for each
political party shall be held in the manner provided in this chapter on the fourth Tuesday in April
2012 first Tuesday in March 2028, and every fourth year thereafter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (a), for the 2024 primary election only, the
election of delegates to the national convention for each political party and for presidential
preference shall be conducted on April 2, 2024.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003947
========